Hawaii statutes.
§103D-205 Authority and duties of the chief
procurement officer. (a) For their respective jurisdictions and unless
otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, each chief procurement officer
shall serve as the central procurement officer for the officer's respective
jurisdiction and:

(1) Procure or supervise the procurement of all
goods, services, and construction;

(2) Exercise general supervision and control over all
inventories of goods;

(3) Sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of surplus
goods;

(4) Establish and maintain programs for the
inspection, testing, and acceptance of goods, services, and construction;

(5) Coordinate with the administrator regarding
procurement policies, opportunities for statewide innovation implementation,
and concerns;

(6) Report procurement contract data pursuant to
requirements established by the administrator, in the form and manner
prescribed by the state procurement office; and

(7) Assist and cooperate with the administrator
regarding any compliance review by the administrator pursuant to section
103D-206.

(b) Consistent with the provisions of this
chapter and rules adopted by the policy board to implement its provisions, the
chief procurement officers may adopt operational procedures to assist in the
performance of these duties and responsibilities. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am
L 1997, c 352, §23; am L 2015, c 181, §1; am L 2016, c 253, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next